District of Columbia statutes.
23-1908

Sexual assault victims' rights.

In addition to the rights set forth in subchapter I of this chapter, a sexual assault victim:

(1)

Shall have the right to have a sexual assault victim advocate present at any:

(A)

Forensic medical, evidentiary, or physical examination;

(B)

Initial interview at the hospital;

(C)

Subsequent in-person interview with law enforcement related to the sexual assault; and

(D)

Point during the hospital visit; and

(2)

Has the right to have an advocate present during the instances listed in paragraph (1) of this section even if the sexual assault victim previously declined the presence of an advocate.

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 101(c), 61 DCR 5913